Utah statutes.
53A-24-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board" means the State Board of Education.

(2)  "DDDS" means the Division of Disability Determination Services.

(3)  "Disability" means a physical or mental condition which materially limits, contributes to limiting, or, if not corrected, will probably result in materially limiting an individual's activities or functioning.

(4)  "DRS" means the Division of Rehabilitation Services.

(5) "DSBVI" means the Division of Services for the Blind and Visually Impaired.

(6)  "DSDHH" means the Division of Services to the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.

(7)  "Eligible individual" means an individual determined to be eligible to receive services under laws or rules governing eligibility for the program in question.

(8)  "Executive director" means the executive director of the Utah State Office of Rehabilitation.

(9)  "Independent living rehabilitation services" means goods and services reasonably necessary to enable an individual with a severe disability to maintain or increase functional independence.

(10)  "Office" means the Utah State Office of Rehabilitation.

(11)  "Vocational rehabilitation services" means goods and services reasonably necessary to enable an individual with a disability to obtain and retain employment.



Amended by Chapter 5, 2001 Special Session 1

